Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1431.04
Act of domestic violence; change of locks; landlord; duties; failure; tenant's remedies.

(1) A landlord required to change locks under section 76-1431.02 or 76-1431.03 shall do so by either:

(a) Replacing the entire locking mechanism with a locking mechanism of equal or better quality than the lock being replaced; or

(b) If the lock is in good working condition:

(i) Rekeying the lock; or

(ii) In the case of a keyless electronic lock, resetting the entry code.

(2)(a) If a landlord fails to change the locks as required by this section, the tenant:

(i) May change the locks in a workmanlike manner with locks of similar or better quality than the original lock;

(ii) Shall timely notify the landlord that the locks have been changed; and

(iii) Shall, by a reasonable method agreed upon by the landlord and tenant, provide the landlord with a new key or the entry code by which to access the dwelling unit.

(b) This subsection applies notwithstanding any provision in the rental agreement to the contrary.

(3) A landlord who installs a new lock pursuant to this section may retain a copy of the key or entry code that opens the new lock.

(4) The landlord may require the tenant to pay for the actual and reasonable cost incurred by the landlord in changing the locks under this section.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 50.